New York, session 2025-2026, S1257.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 2 995-c-1 to read as follows: 3 § 995-c-1. Evidence. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or 4 regulation to the contrary, the New York state police forensic investi- 5 gation center shall accept evidence items or samples for DNA analysis 6 from any firearm, rifle, shotgun, ammunition or magazine loading device 7 when the sole charge is criminal possession of a weapon in the first 8 degree as defined in section 265.04 of the penal law, criminal 9 possession of a weapon in the second degree as defined in section 265.03 10 of the penal law, criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as 11 defined in section 265.02 of the penal law, criminal possession of a 12 weapon in the fourth degree as defined in section 265.01 of the penal 13 law and criminal possession of a firearm as defined in section 265.01-b 14 of the penal law. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03642-01-5